Mississippi statutes. Title 59. Ports, Harbors, Landings and Watercraft
Numbering of Undocumented Vessels

§ 59-21-5.
Requirement of numbering of undocumented vessels.

All sailboats and every undocumented vessel equipped with propulsion machinery, whether or not such machinery is the principal source of propulsion, using the territorial and navigable waters of the State of Mississippi, and every such vessel owned in the State of Mississippi and using the high seas shall be numbered in accordance with this chapter, except:

Foreign vessels temporarily using the navigable waters of the State of Mississippi;

Public vessels of the United States;

State and municipal vessels used solely for official business and displaying proper visual identification on its hull;

Ships’ lifeboats;

Vessels designated by the appropriate federal authority;

Undocumented vessels used exclusively for racing;

Undocumented vessels operating under valid temporary certificates of number;

Vessels already covered by a number in full force and effect awarded pursuant to federal law, or a federally approved numbering system of another state, provided that such vessels shall not have been within this state for a period in excess of sixty (60) days. Nothing in this section shall prohibit the numbering of any undocumented vessel upon the request of the owner.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8496-03; Laws, 1960, ch. 165, § 3; Laws, 1962, ch. 220, § 2; Laws, 1968, ch. 265, § 3; Laws, 1973, ch. 409, § 2; Laws, 1988, ch. 599, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1988.

§ 59-21-7.
Numbering pattern.

The numbering pattern to be used shall be as follows:

The number shall be divided into three (3) parts. The first part shall consist of the symbol MI; the second part shall consist of a numerical group having a maximum of four (4) digits; the third part shall consist of an alphabetical group having a maximum of two (2) letters. Each part shall be separated by hyphens or equivalent spaces.

Vessels shall be given numerical and alphabetical designations in the second and third groups in the order of their application.

The number awarded to a vessel under the provisions of this chapter shall remain the number for such vessel until the vessel is lost, destroyed, abandoned or registered in another state.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8496-05; Laws, 1960, ch. 165, § 5; Laws, 1962, ch. 220, § 3; Laws, 1964, ch. 468, § 2; Laws, 1986, ch. 364, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1987.

§ 59-21-9.
Display of awarded number on vessel; use of other numbers prohibited.

The number awarded shall be painted on or attached to each side of the bow of the vessel for which it was issued. The numbers shall be placed on each side of the forward half of the vessel in such position as to provide clear legibility for identification. The numbers shall read from left to right and shall be in block characters of good proportion not less than three inches in height. The numbers shall be of a color which will contrast with the color of the background and so maintained as to be clearly visible and legible, i.e., dark numbers on a light background, or light numbers on a dark background. No other number shall be carried on the bow of such vessel.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8496-06; Laws, 1960, ch. 165, § 6, eff from and after passage (approved April 14, 1960).

§ 59-21-11.
Application for certificate of number.

The owner of any vessel required to be numbered under this chapter shall apply, within ten (10) days from the date of acquisition of the vessel, to the commission, on forms provided, for a certificate of number. The application for a number shall include the following:

Name and address of owner.

Date of birth of owner.

Social Security number or driver’s license number of the owner.

Present citizenship of owner (county, state, country).

County in which the vessel is principally used.

Present number (if any).

Hull material (wood, steel, aluminum, plastic, other).

Type of propulsion (outboard, inboard, other).

Type of fuel (gas, diesel, other).

Length of vessel.

Make and year built (if known).

Statement as to use (pleasure, livery, dealer, manufacturer, commercial-passenger, commercial-fishing, commercial-other).

A certification of ownership by the applicant.

Serial number of outboard motor, boat and trailer owned by the applicant.

Signature of owner.

A receipt, sales or otherwise, which shows whether or not a sales or use tax was paid at the time of the purchase of the vessel. If the vessel was purchased outside the State of Mississippi, from and after July 1, 1978, and the tax for the privilege of using or consuming tangible personal property imposed by Section 27-67-5 was not paid at the time the vessel was acquired, then the owner shall be required to pay the tax as provided by the Mississippi Use Tax Law before a certificate of number can be issued.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8496-07; Laws, 1960, ch. 165, § 7; Laws, 1962, ch. 220, § 4; Laws, 1964, ch. 468, § 3; Laws, 1968, ch. 361, § 56; Laws, 1975, ch. 468, § 1; Laws, 1978, ch. 454, § 1; Laws, 1995, ch. 606, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1995.

§ 59-21-13.
Renewal of certificate of number; notice as to loss or destruction; replacement of certificate of number.

An application for renewal of a certificate of number shall be made by the owner on an application which must be received by the commission within the last ninety (90) days before the expiration date on the certificate of number. The same number will be issued upon renewal. If a certificate of number is lost or destroyed, the owner shall, within fifteen (15) days, notify the commission’s office. The notification shall be in writing, shall describe the circumstances of the loss or destruction and shall be accompanied by the fee prescribed in this chapter. The certificate of number issued as a result of such report will replace the certificate so lost or destroyed.

The commission shall mail notice of expiration of numbers, together with an application for renewal of number, to each registered boat owner not less than sixty (60) days prior to the expiration date. The commission shall verify annually an up-to-date list of all numbers in effect and those numbers not renewed.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8496-08; Laws, 1960, ch. 165, § 8; Laws, 1968, ch. 361, § 57; Laws, 1975, ch. 468, § 2; Laws, 1986, ch. 364, § 2; Laws, 2000, ch. 369, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2000.

§ 59-21-15.
Certified statement of ownership as evidence of ownership; effect of liens as to determination of ownership; application for number by person obtaining title through default in terms of lien instrument.

The certified statement of ownership on the application for the award of a number shall constitute prima facie evidence of proof of ownership. Liens of all kinds, including reservations or transfers of title to secure debts or claims, will be disregarded in determining ownership under this chapter. A lienholder who acquires possession and title by virtue of default in the terms of the lien instrument, or any other person who acquires ownership through any such action of a lienholder, may apply for a number and shall attach to such application a signed statement explaining the facts in detail.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8496-09; Laws, 1960, ch. 165, § 9, eff from and after passage (approved April 14, 1960).

§ 59-21-17.
Contents of certificate of number; duties of commission; release of information on vessels; fees and charges for copying, certifying or searching records.

The certificate of number shall include the following:

Name and address of owner.

Date of birth of owner.

Present citizenship of owner (county, state, country).

County in which vessel is principally used.

Present number (if any).

Hull material (wood, steel, aluminum, plastic, other).

Type of propulsion (outboard, inboard, other).

Type of fuel (gas, diesel, other).

Length of vessel.

Make and year built (if known).

Statement as to use (pleasure, livery, dealer, manufacturer, commercial-passenger, commercial-fishing, commercial-other).

A certificate of ownership by the applicant.

Signature of owner.

Number awarded to vessel.

Expiration date of certificate.

Notice to the owner that he shall report within fifteen (15) days changes of ownership or address, and destruction or abandonment of vessel.

Notice to the owner that the operator shall:

Always carry this certificate on vessel when in use.

Report every accident involving injury or death to persons, or property damage over One Hundred Dollars ($100.00).

Stop and render aid or assistance if involved in a boating accident.

The commission shall furnish and ensure that the forms required by this section and Section 59-21-13 are stocked at various county offices, boat companies, fishing camps, marinas, with enforcement officers, and at such other places as to make them available to boat owners. The commission shall award certificates of number and shall keep current a consolidated record of all certificates of numbers awarded and renewals of numbers.

Upon request, information on ownership and identity of numbered vessels shall be available to federal, state and local officials, as needed, in any enforcement or assistance programs. The records pertaining to the numbering of undocumented vessels pursuant to this chapter are considered to be public records. Information based on such records may be released upon oral or written inquiry, subject only to reasonable restrictions necessary to carry on the business of the office. The commission may permit excerpts to be made or the copying or reproduction thereof by a private individual or concern. The fees and charges for copying, certifying or searching of records for information shall be assessed in accordance with usual fees allowed for such services.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8496-10; Laws, 1960, ch. 165, § 10; Laws, 1968, ch. 361, § 58; Laws, 1975, ch. 468, § 3; Laws, 1986, ch. 364, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 1987.

§ 59-21-19.
Size of certificate of number; temporary certificates; expiration dates; livery boat certificates; manufacturers’ and dealers’ certificates and numbers.

The certificate of number shall be pocket-size, approximately two and one-half inches (2-1/2") by three and one-half inches (3-1/2"), and water resistant.

Pending the issuance of the original certificate of number, the owner of the vessel may be furnished a temporary certificate of number valid for sixty (60) days from the date of issue. This temporary certificate shall be carried on board when the vessel is being operated.

Each applicant for an original or transfer certificate of number, who is entitled to issuance thereof, shall be issued a certificate for a period of three (3) years from the last day of the month of receipt of the original or transfer certificate. This subsection shall not apply to the certificate of number of a livery boat.

The certificate of number of a livery boat shall be plainly marked “livery boat.” The description of the motor and type of fuel will be omitted from the certificate of number in any case where the motor is not rented with the boat. Original and renewal certificates of number of a livery boat shall be valid for a period of three (3) years and shall expire at midnight on June 30.

Numbers and certificates of number awarded boats operated by manufacturers and dealers may be transferred from one (1) boat to another. In lieu of the description, the word “manufacturer” or “dealer”, as appropriate, will be plainly marked on each certificate. The manufacturer or dealer may have the number awarded printed upon or attached to a removable sign or signs to be temporarily mounted upon or attached to the boat being demonstrated or tested so long as the display meets the requirements of Section 59-21-9.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8496-11; Laws, 1960, ch. 165, § 11; Laws, 1962, ch. 220, § 5; Laws, 1964, ch. 468, § 4; Laws, 1979, ch. 383; Laws, 2006, ch. 521, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2006.

§ 59-21-21.
Surrender of certificate of number; notification of change of owner’s address or loss, destruction, abandonment or transfer of vessel; application for number by new owner of vessel.

When the owner of a numbered vessel removes his residence to another state, or the numbered vessel is not usually moored, docked, housed or garaged within this state, the owner shall, within ninety (90) days thereafter, surrender the certificate of number to the commission.

When the owner of a numbered vessel changes his address from that shown on the certificate of number, he shall notify the commission of his new address within a period not to exceed fifteen (15) days from such change.

When a numbered vessel is lost, destroyed, abandoned or transferred to another person, the certificate of number issued for the vessel shall be surrendered to the commission within a period not to exceed fifteen (15) days after such event. When the vessel is lost, destroyed or abandoned and the certificate of number has been destroyed, the owner shall, within fifteen (15) days, notify the commission by letter or postal card of the change in the status of the vessel.

The application for number by a new owner of a vessel shall, for the purpose of fee, be regarded as an original application for number, but where the vessel will continue in use in the state, the new number shall be identical with the previous one.

A change of motor is not required to be reported to the commission.

The owner of an undocumented vessel shall not have more than one (1) valid number or valid certificate of number for any one (1) vessel at any time.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8496-12; Laws, 1960, ch. 165, § 12; Laws, 1968, ch. 361, § 59; Laws, 1975, ch. 468, § 4; Laws, 1986, ch. 364, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 1987.

§ 59-21-23.
Cancellation or voiding of certificate of number.

Certificates of number may be cancelled or voided under the following circumstances:

Surrender of certificate for cancellation;

Issuance of a new number for the same vessel;

Issuance of a marine document by the Bureau of Customs for the same vessel;

False or fraudulent certification in an application for number;

Willful mutilation, defacing, or altering of a number.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8496-13; Laws, 1960, ch. 165, § 13; Laws, 1973, ch. 409, § 3; Laws, 1986, ch. 364, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 1987.

§ 59-21-25.
Fees for certificates of number; disposition of proceeds.

Fees for the award of certificates of number for original, transfer, renewal, livery, dealer and duplicate shall be as follows:

Less than 16 feet. . . . .$ 7.50

16 feet but less than 26 feet. . . . .$22.50

26 feet but less than 40 feet. . . . .$45.00

40 feet and over. . . . .$45.00

Dealer number. . . . .$37.50

Duplicate. . . . .$ 5.00

Boat inspection fee. . . . .$10.00

The fee provided for under subsection (1)(g) of this section shall only be charged when the owner of a boat requests the Department of Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks to perform an inspection of a boat serial number for the purpose of replacing or awarding a damaged or removed serial number.

All fees for numbers and renewal of number shall be payable to the Mississippi Department of Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks to be deposited by the department in the State Treasury in a special fund to be designated as the Fisheries and Wildlife Fund, which shall be disbursed upon the recommendation of the department as may be appropriated by the Legislature. The State Treasurer shall release to the department such sums as are required to defray all administrative costs of the boat registration fee division of the department and to improve the law enforcement capability of the department on the inland and marine waters of the State of Mississippi and as may be budgeted by the department for the purpose of paying the cost of the administration of this chapter for education on water safety, improvement of water safety and motorboating facilities in the state, and advertising and promoting the waterways of the state. Any and all revenue over and above the actual administrative cost of implementing this chapter shall be used to fund salaries of additional conservation officers in all eighty-two (82) counties.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8496-14; Laws, 1960, ch. 165, § 14; Laws, 1964, ch. 468, § 5; Laws, 1968, ch. 361, § 60; Laws, 1975, ch. 468, § 5; Laws, 1982, ch 365, § 13; Laws, 1988, ch. 599, § 2; Laws, 2000, ch. 516, § 128; Laws, 2006, ch. 521, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2006.

§ 59-21-27.
Additional certificates of numbers for livery boats; fees; renewals.

An owner of more than one livery boat shall be entitled to be awarded certificates of number for all such vessels on the payment of fees provided in Section 59-21-25. Each vessel shall have a separate and distinct number and shall be issued a separate certificate of number. Certificates of number under this section may be renewed on the payment of a single fee provided in Section 59-21-25.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8496-15; Laws, 1960, ch. 165, § 15; Laws, 1962, ch. 220, § 6; Laws, 1964, ch. 468, § 6; Laws, 1988, ch. 599, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 1988.

§ 59-21-29.
Registration of serial numbers of outboard motors.

Each person registering a boat or boats under this chapter may at the same time register with the commission the serial numbers of all outboard motors owned by said person.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8496-25; Laws, 1960, ch. 165, § 25; Laws, 1973, ch. 458, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved April 9, 1973).

§ 59-21-31.
Alteration of identification numbers or marks on vessels, outboard motors, boats or boat trailers; purchase, sale or possession of vessels, outboard motors, boats or boat trailers with altered identifications; examinations and reports.

No person shall remove, change or in any manner mutilate or deface any number awarded a vessel, or any motor number or other stamped, cast, or forged numbers or letters or other marks upon any vessel, outboard motor, boat or boat trailer, or assist in so doing, or, having knowledge of such change, fail to report the same to the Department of Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks in which such vessel, motor, boat or boat trailer is usually moored, docked, housed or garaged. Any person or owner, being in possession of a vessel, outboard motor, boat or boat trailer, shall examine the same and report such changes to the Department of Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks.

No person shall buy, sell or possess a vessel, outboard motor, boat or boat trailer on which any awarded number or identification number has been removed, changed, mutilated or defaced. It shall be the duty of any person buying, or any lienholder financing, a vessel, outboard motor, boat or boat trailer, to inspect the vessel, outboard motor, boat or boat trailer prior to its purchase or creation of a lien thereon, to ensure that it is in compliance with this section.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8496-25; Laws, 1960, ch. 165, § 25; Laws, 1993, ch. 480, § 1; Laws, 1995, ch. 551, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 1995.

§ 59-21-33.
Seizure and forfeiture of vessels, outboard motors, boats and trailers with altered identification numbers or marks.

All vessels, outboard motors, boats and trailers having awarded numbers or identification numbers or marks which have been removed, changed, mutilated or defaced contrary to this chapter are subject to forfeiture. Any such property shall be seized by any conservation officer or enforcement officer of the Department of Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks, or other officer of the law including any sheriff or deputy sheriff. Upon the seizure of such property, forfeiture proceedings shall be instituted pursuant to Sections 49-7-251 through 49-7-257. Provided, however, that any such property which has previously been registered or titled within the State of Mississippi is not subject to forfeiture if the application for registration or title contained no false or fraudulent information, or if the property seized has a value less than One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00).

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8496-25; Laws, 1960, ch. 165, § 25; Laws, 1982, ch. 365, § 12; Laws, 1991, ch. 522, § 6; Laws, 1993, ch. 480, § 2; Laws, 1995, ch. 551, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 1995.